West Virginia, session 2026, SB1003.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 11. Parental Support & Pediatric Access. §9-11-1. The "Home-First" Mandate. It is the policy of this state that no child under the age of 12 should be removed from their home for mental health reasons solely because community-based resources were unavailable. The state shall prioritize funding for in-home clinical support. §9-11-2. Regional Pediatric Resource Hubs. The Secretary of Human Services shall establish three regional pediatric mental health hubs (Northern, Southern, and Central). Each hub shall:(1) Maintain a real-time directory for services in their area;(2) Maintain a live map of every available pediatric counselor and their current wait time for services in their area; (3) Provide bridge coaching to the parent that shall include providing the parent with a behavioral health coach within 48 hours of first contact to help manage the crisis at home during the time the child is on a waitlist for a physician appointment or is scheduled for a future appointment; and.(4) Establish secure telehealth kiosks in county health departments so parents without high-speed internet can access specialty appointments. §9-11-3. Funding the future. The Legislature shall divert five percent of funds currently spent on "Out-of-State Residential Placement" to the Pediatric Resource Fund to pay for these in-home services. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home